pt-BR: Filamento compatível: Acrilonitrila butadieno estireno (ABS); Fibra de carbono; Cerâmica; Condutor; Flexível; Seguro para alimentos; Brilho; Brilha no escuro; Poliestireno de alto impacto (HIPS); Magnética; Mármore; Metal; Nylon; Policromático; Polietileno tereftalato de glicol (PETG); Ácido polilático (PLA); Álcool polivinílico (PVA); Filamento reciclado; Resina; Seda; Poliuretano termoplástico (TPU); Transparente/invisível; Sensível a UV; Material de suporte solúvel em água; Madeira; Outro
ja: 適合フィラメント: アクリロニトリルブタジエンスチレン (ABS); カーボンファイバー; セラミック; 導電性; フレキシブル; 食品に使っても安全; グリッター; 暗闇で光る; 耐衝撃性ポリスチレン (HIPS); 磁気; 大理石; 金属; ナイロン; 多色性; ポリエチレンテレフタラートグリコール (PETG); ポリ乳酸 (PLA); ポリビニルアルコール (PVA); 再生フィラメント; レジン; シルク; 熱可塑性ポリウレタン (TPU); 透明/クリア; UV感光性; 水溶性サポート材; 木材; その他
lt-LT: Suderinamas pluoštas: Akrilnitrilo butadieno stirenas (ABS); Anglies pluoštas; Keramika; Laidus; Lankstus; Saugus maistui; Blizgučiai; Švytintis tamsoje; Didelio poveikio polistirenas (HIPS); Magnetinis; Marmuras; Metalas; Nailonas; Polichromatinis; Polietileno tereftalato glikolis (PETG); Polipieno rūgštis (PLA); Polivinilo alkoholis (PVA); Perdirbtas pluoštas; Derva; Šilkas; Termoplastinis poliuretanas (TPU); Skaidrus / permatomas; Jautrus UV spinduliams; Vandenyje tirpi pagalbinė medžiaga; Mediena; Kita
de: Kompatibles Filament: Acrylnitril-Butadien-Styrol (ABS); Kohlenstofffaser; Keramik; Leitfähig; Flexibel; Lebensmittelecht; Glitzer; Nachtleuchtend; Schlagfestes Polystyrol (HIPS); Magnetisch; Marmor; Metall; Nylon; Regenbogen; Polyethylenterephthalat-Glykol (PETG); Polylactid (PLA); Polyvinylalkohol (PVA); Wiederverwertetes Filament; Harz; Seide; Thermoplastisches Polyurethan (TPU); Transparent/Durchsichtig; UV-empfindlich; Wasserlösliches Trägermaterial; Holz; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Združljiv filament: Akrilonitril butadien stiren (ABS); Ogljikova vlakna; Keramika; Prevodno; Prilagodljivo; Varno za hrano; Bleščice; Sveti v temi; Odporni polistiren (HIPS); Magnetno; Marmor; Kovina; Najlon; Polikromatski; Polietilen tereftalat glikol (PETG); Polimlečna kislina (PLA); Polivinilalkohol (PVA); Recikliran filament; Smola; Svila; Termoplastični poliuretan (TPU); Prozorno/jasno; UV-občutljivo; Vodotopni nosilni material; Les; Drugo
sv: Kompatibelt filament: Akrylnitrilbutadienstyren (ABS); Kolfiber; Keramisk; Ledande; Flexibel; Livsmedelssäker; Glitter; Självlysande; Högslagfast polystyren (HIPS); Magnetisk; Marmor; Metall; Nylon; Polykrom; Polyetentereftalatglykol (PETG); Polymjölksyra (PLA); Polyvinylalkohol (PVA); Återvunnet filament; Harts; Silke; Termoplastisk polyuretan (TPU); Genomskinlig tejp/klar; UV-känslig; Vattenlösligt stödmaterial; Trä; Annat
pt-PT: Filamento compatível: Acrilonitrilo butadieno estireno (ABS); Fibra de carbono; Cerâmica; Condutor; Flexível; Seguro para alimentos; Purpurinas; Brilha no escuro; Poliestireno de alto impacto (HIPS); Magnético; Mármore; Metal; Náilon; Policromático; Polietileno tereftalato de glicol (PETG); Ácido poliláctico (PLA); Álcool polivinílico (PVA); Filamento reciclado; Resina; Seda; Poliuretano termoplástico (TPU); Claro; Sensível aos UV; Material de suporte solúvel em água; Madeira; Outro
ru: Совместимые нити: Акрилонитрилбутадиенстирол (АБС); Углеродное волокно; Керамика; Проводящий; Гибкий; Безопасно для пищевых продуктов; С блестками; Светится в темноте; Ударопрочный полистирол (HIPS); Магнит; Мрамор; Металл; Нейлон; Многоцветный; Полиэтилентерефталатгликоль (ПЭТГ); Полимолочная кислота (PLA); Поливиниловый спирт (ПВС); Переработанная нить; Смола; Шелк; Термопластичный полиуретан (ТПУ); Прозрачный/бесцветный; Чувствительный к УФ-излучению; Водорастворимый материал; Дерево; Другое
bg-BG: Съвместим филамент: Акрилонитрил-бутадиен-стирол (ABS); Въглеродни влакна; Керамика; Проводим; Гъвкав; Безопасен за хранителни продукти; Блясък; Светещ в тъмното; Полистирол с висока степен на въздействие (HIPS); Магнитен; Мрамор; Метал; Найлон; Полихроматичен; Полиетилен терефталат гликол (PETG); Полимлечна киселина (PLA); Поливинилов алкохол (PVA); Рециклирана нишка; Смола; Коприна; Термопластичен полиуретан (TPU); Прозрачен/ясен; Ултравиолетова чувствителност; Водоразтворим поддържащ материал; Дърво; Други
pl: Zgodny żarnik: Akrylonitryl-butadien-styren (ABS); Włókno węglowe; Ceramika; Przewodzący; Elastyczne; Bezpieczny dla żywności; Brokat; Świecący w ciemności; Styropian wysokoudarowy (HIPS); Magnetyczny; Marmur; Metal; Nylon; Polichromatyczne; Glikol politereftalanu etylenu (PETG); Polikwas mlekowy (PLA); Alkohol poliwinylowy (PVA); Żarnik z recyklingu; Żywica; Jedwab; Poliuretan termoplastyczny (TPU); Przezroczysty/jasny; Wrażliwy na promieniowanie UV; Rozpuszczalny w wodzie materiał nośny; Drewno; Pozostałe
nl: Compatibel filament: Acrylonitril-butadieen-styreen (ABS); Koolstofvezel; Keramiek; Geleidend; Flexibel; Voedselveilig; Glitter; Glow-in-the-dark; Slagvast polystyreen (HIPS); Magnetisch; Marmer; Metaal; Nylon; Polychromatisch; Polyethyleentereftalaatglycol (PETG); Polymelkzuur (PLA); Polyvinylalcohol (PVA); Gerecycled filament; Hars; Zijde; Thermoplastisch polyurethaan (TPU); Transparant/helder; UV-gevoelig; In water oplosbaar dragermateriaal; Hout; Andere
cs: Kompatibilní tisková struna: Akrylonitril butadien styren (ABS); Uhlíkové vlákno; Keramika; Vodivé; Pružná; Bezpečné pro potraviny; Třpytky; Svítící ve tmě; Tvrzený polystyren (HIPS); Magnetická; Mramor; Kov; Nylon; Polychromatické; Polyethylentereftalát glykol (PETG); Polymléčná kyselina (PLA); Polyvinylalkohol (PVA); Recyklované vlákno; Pryskyřice; Hedvábí; Termoplastický polyuretan (TPU); Průhledné/Čiré; Citlivé na UV záření; Ve vodě rozpustný nosný materiál; Dřevo; Jiné
it: Filamento compatibile: Acrilonitrile butadiene stirene (ABS); Fibra di carbonio; Ceramica; Conduttivo; Flessibile; Per uso alimentare; Glitter; Che si illuminano al buio; Polistirene ad alto impatto (HIEPS); Magnetico; Marmo; Metallo; Nylon; Policromatico; Glicole di polietilene tereftalato (PETG); Acido polilattico (PLA); Alcool polivinilico (PVA); Filamento riciclato; Resina; Seta; Poliuretano termoplastico (TPU); Trasparente/Chiaro; Sensibile ai raggi UV; Materiale di supporto idrosolubile; Legno; Altro
es: Filamento compatible: Acrilonitrilo butadieno estireno (ABS); Fibra de carbono; Cerámica; Conductivo; Flexible; Apto para alimentos; Purpurina; Brilla en la oscuridad; Poliestireno de alto impacto (HIPS); Magnético; Mármol; Metal; Nylon; Policromático; Tereftalato de polietileno glicolado (PETG); Ácido poliláctico (PLA); Alcohol polivinílico (PVA); Filamento reciclado; Resina; Seda; Poliuretano termoplástico (TPU); Transparente/Claro; Sensible a los rayos UV; Material de soporte soluble en agua; Madera; Otros
hr-HR: Kompatibilni filament: Akrilonitril butadien stiren (ABS); Karbonska vlakna; Keramika; Vodljivi; Fleksibilni; Sigurno za hranu; Šljokice; Svijetli u mraku; Udarni polistiren (HIPS); Magnetni; Mramor; Metal; Najlon; Polikromatsko; Polietilen tereftalat glikol (PETG); Polimliječna kiselina (PLA); Polivinil alkohol (PVA); Reciklirani filament; Smola; Svila; Termoplastični poliuretan (TPU); Prozirno/bistro; Osjetljivo na UV zračenje; Nosivi materijal topiv u vodi; Drvo; Ostalo
en: Compatible filament: Acrylonitrile butadiene styrene (ABS); Carbon fiber; Ceramic; Conductive; Flexible; Food-safe; Glitter; Glow-in-the-dark; High impact polystyrene (HIPS); Magnetic; Marble; Metal; Nylon; Polychromatic; Polyethylene terephthalate glycol (PETG); Polylactic acid (PLA); Polyvinyl alcohol (PVA); Recycled filament; Resin; Silk; Thermoplastic polyurethane (TPU); Transparent/Clear; UV-sensitive; Water-soluble support material; Wood; Other
sk-SK: Kompatibilný filament: Akrylonitrilbutadiénstyrén (ABS); Uhlíkové vlákno; Keramický; Vodivý; Flexibilný; Bezpečné pre potraviny; Trblietavý; Svietiaci v tme; Vysokopevnostný polystyrén (HIPS); Magnetický; Mramor; Kov; Nylon; Polychromatický; Polyetyléntereftalátglykol (PETG); Kyselina polymliečna (PLA); Polyvinylalkohol (PVA); Recyklované vlákno; Živica; Hodváb; Termoplastický polyuretán (TPU); Priehľadný/čistý; UV-citlivý; Nosný materiál rozpustný vo vode; Drevo; Iné
ro-RO: Filament compatibil: Acrilonitril butadien stiren (ABS); Fibră de carbon; Ceramic; Conductiv; Flexibil; Sigur pentru alimente; Sclipici; Fosforescent; Polistiren de mare impact (HIPS); Magnetic; Marmură; Metal; Nailon; Policromatic; Polietilen tereftalat glicol (PETG); Acid polilactic (PLA); Alcool polivinilic (PVA); Filament reciclat; Rășină; Mătase; Poliuretan termoplastic (TPU); Transparent/translucid; Sensibil la UV; Material de suport solubil în apă; Lemn; Altele
vi: Dây tóc tương thích: Acrylonitrile butadiene styrene (ABS); Sợi carbon; Gốm; Dẫn điện; Mềm dẻo; An toàn thực phẩm; Óng ánh; Dạ quang; Polystyrene chịu lực cao (HIPS); Từ tính; Cẩm thạch; Kim loại; Nylon; Polychromatic; Polyethylene terephthalate glycol (PETG); Axit polylactic (PLA); Polyvinyl alcohol (PVA); Tơ tái chế; Nhựa resin; Lụa; Polyurethane nhiệt dẻo (TPU); Trong suốt; Nhạy cảm với tia cực tím; Vật liệu hỗ trợ hòa tan trong nước; Gỗ; Khác
zh-CN: 适用灯丝: 丙烯腈丁二烯苯乙烯 (ABS); 碳纤维; 陶瓷制品; 导电的; 灵活式; 食品安全级; 闪粉; 夜光; 高抗冲聚苯乙烯 (HIPS); 磁力; 大理石; 金属; 尼龙; 复合色彩; 聚对苯二甲酸乙二醇酯 (PETG); 聚乳酸 (PLA); 聚乙烯醇 (PVA); 再生长丝; 树脂; 丝绸; 热塑性聚氨酯 (TPU); 透明/清亮; 紫外线敏感; 水溶性支撑材料; 木头; 其他
tr: Uyumlu Filament: Akrilonitril bütadien stiren (ABS); Karbon fiber; Seramik; İletken; Esnek; Gıdayla temasa uygun; Simli; Karanlıkta parlayan; Yüksek darbe dirençli polistiren (HIPS); Manyetik; Mermer; Metal; Plastik; Çok renkli; Polietilen tereftalat glikol (PETG); Polilaktik asit (PLA); Polivinil alkol (PVA); Geri dönüştürülmüş filament; Reçine; İpek; Termoplastik poliüretan (TPU); Transparan/Şeffaf; UV ışınlarına duyarlı; Suda çözünebilen destek malzemesi; Ahşap; Diğer
el: Συμβατό νήμα: Ακρυλονιτρίλιο βουταδιένιο στυρόλιο (ABS); Ανθρακόνημα; Κεραμικό; Αγώγιμο; Εύκαμπτο; Ασφαλές για τρόφιμα; Γκλίτερ; Λάμψης στο σκοτάδι; Πολυστυρόλιο υψηλής αντοχής στην κρούση (HIPS); Μαγνητικό; Μάρμαρο; Μέταλλο; Νάιλον; Πολυχρωματικό; Πολυαιθυλενογλυκόλη τερεφθαλική (PETG); Πολυγαλακτικό οξύ (PLA); Πολυβινυλική αλκοόλη (PVA); Ανακυκλωμένο νήμα; Ρητίνη; Μετάξι; Θερμοπλαστική πολυουρεθάνη (TPU); Διαφανές/Διαυγές; Ευαίσθητο στην υπεριώδη ακτινοβολία; Υδατοδιαλυτό σταθεροποιητικό υλικό; Ξύλο; Άλλο
fr: Filament compatible: Acrylonitrile butadiène styrène (ABS); Fibre de carbone; Céramique; Conducteur; Flexible; Sans danger pour les aliments; Paillettes; Brille dans le noir; Polystyrène à fort impact (HIPS); Magnétique; Marbre; Métal; Nylon; Polychrome; Polyéthylène téréphtalate glycol (PETG); Acide polylactique (PLA); Alcool polyvinylique (PVA); Filament recyclé; Résine; Soie; Polyuréthane thermoplastique (TPU); Transparent/clair; Sensible aux UV; Matériau de support soluble dans l'eau; Bois; Autre
nb: Kompatibel filament: Akrylnitrilbutadienstyren (ABS); Karbonfiber; Keramikk; Ledende; Fleksibel; Matsikker; Glitter; Selvlysende; Svært slagfast polystyren (HIPS); Magnetisk; Marmor; Metall; Nylon; Polykromatisk; Polybutylen-tereftalat-glykol (PETG); Polyaktidsyre (PLA); Polyvinylalkohol (PVA); Resirkulert filament; Harpiks; Silke; Termoplastisk polyuretan (TPU); Gjennomsiktig/klar; UV-sensitive; Vannløselig støttemateriale; Trevirke; Annen
zh-TW: 相容燈絲: 丙烯腈丁二烯苯乙烯 (ABS); 碳纖維; 陶瓷; 導電; 柔韌; 食品安全; 亮粉; 在黑暗中發光; 高抗衝聚苯乙烯; 磁性; 大理石; 金屬; 尼龍; 多色; 聚對苯二甲酸乙二醇酯 (PET) 氈; 聚乳酸 (PLA); 聚乙烯醇 (PVA); 再生絲; 樹脂; 絲綢; 熱塑性聚氨酯 (TPU); 透明膠帶; 紫外線敏感; 水溶性支撐材料; 木材; 其他
th: เส้นใยที่รองรับ: อะคริโลไนไตรลบิวตาไดอีนสไตรีน (ABS); เส้นใยคาร์บอน; เซรามิก; ตัวนำไฟฟ้า; ขอบยืดหยุ่น; เหมาะต่อการใช้กับอาหาร; กลิตเตอร์; เรืองแสงในที่มืด; โพลิสไตรีนแรงกระแทกสูง (HIPS); แม่เหล็ก; หินอ่อน; โลหะ; ไนลอน; หลายสี; กลีคอลโพลิเอทิลีนเทเรฟทาเลตไกลคอล (PETG); กรดโพลิแลคติก (PLA); โพลิไวนิลแอลกอฮอล์ (PVA); เส้นใยรีไซเคิล; เรซิน; ผ้าไหม; เทอร์โมพลาสติกโพลิยูรีเทน (TPU); โปร่งใส/ใส; ไวต่อรังสี UV; วัสดุค้ำยันที่ละลายน้ำได้; ไม้; อื่นๆ
da: Kompatibel filament: Acrylonitril-butadien-styren (ABS); Kulfiber; Keramik; Ledende; Fleksibel; Fødevaresikker; Glitter; Selvlysende; High impact-polystyren (HIPS); Magnetisk; Marmor; Metal; Nylon; Polykromatisk; Polyethylenterephthalatglycol (PETG); Polymælkesyre (PLA); Polyvinylalkohol (PVA); Genanvendt filament; Harpiks; Silke; Termoplastisk polyurethan (TPU); Gennemsigtig/klar; UV-sensitiv; Vandopløseligt støttemateriale; Træ; Andet
hu: Kompatibilis izzószál: Akrilnitril-butadién-sztirol (ABS); Szénszál; Kerámia; Vezető; Flexibilis; Élelmiszerekhez használható; Csillogó; Foszforeszkáló; Ütésálló polisztirol (HIPS); Mágneses; Márvány; Fém; Nejlon; Többszínű; Polietilén-tereftalát-glikol (PETG); Politejsav (PLA); Polivinil-alkohol (PVA); Újrahasznosított szál; Gyanta; Selyem; Hőre lágyuló poliuretán (TPU); Átlátszó/tiszta; UV-érzékeny; Vízben oldódó hordozóanyag; Fa; Egyéb
ko: 호환 가능한 필라멘트: 아크릴로니트릴 부타디엔 스티렌(ABS); 탄소 섬유; 세라믹; 전도성; 유연함; 식품 안전; 반짝이; 형광; 고충격 폴리스티렌(HIPS); 자기식; 대리석; 금속; 나일론; 다색성; 폴리에틸렌 테레프탈레이트 글리콜(PETG); 폴리락틱 산(PLA); 폴리비닐 알코올(PVA); 재생 필라멘트; 수지; 실크; 열가소성 폴리우레탄(TPU); 투명; UV 민감성; 수용성 지지체; 목재; 기타
fi: Yhteensopiva säie: Akryylinitriilibutadieenistyreeni (ABS); Hiilikuitu; Keraaminen; Johtava; Joustava; Elintarviketurvallinen; Kimalle; Pimeässä loistava; Iskunkestävä polystyreeni (HIPS); Magneettinen; Marmori; Metalli; Nailon; Monivärinen; Polyeteenitereftalaattiglykoli (PETG); Polylmaitohappo (PLA); Polyvinyylialkoholi (PVA); Kierrätetty filamentti; Hartsi; Silkki; Termoplastinen polyuretaani (TPU); Läpinäkyvä/kirkas; UV-herkkä; Vesiliukoinen tukimateriaali; Puu; Muu